District of Columbia statutes.
1-620.33

Motor vehicle operators.

Any District government employee who operates a motor vehicle in the performance of his or her employment within the District of Columbia shall be deemed to have given his or her consent, subject to the conditions in this subchapter, to the testing of the employee’s urine or breath for the purpose of determining drug or alcohol content whenever a supervisor has probable cause or a police officer arrests such person for a violation of the law and has reasonable grounds to believe such person to have been operating or in physical control of a motor vehicle within the District while that person is intoxicated as defined by § 50-2206.01(9), or while under the influence of an intoxicating liquor or any drug or combination thereof, or while that person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle is impaired by the consumption of intoxicating liquor.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2033
as added Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 102, 52 DCR 2331
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-195, § 4(b), 53 DCR 8675
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 304(b), 59 DCR 12957

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-195 substituted “alcohol concentration was 0.08 grams or more per 210 liters of breath” for “breath contains .08% or more, by weight, of alcohol”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 substituted “person is intoxicated as defined by § 50-2206.01(9)” for “person’s alcohol concentration was 0.08 grams or more per 210 liters of breath.”

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-164, June 25, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 6500).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-2, May 3, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 3782).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-117, March 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3804).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-319, on April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4708).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-310, March 26, 2002, 49 DCR 3420).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-3, January 22, 2003, 50 DCR 1426).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-71, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3593).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-279, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 60).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-407, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3659).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-630, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1143).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(a)(2) of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-469, July 31, 2006, 53 DCR 6764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(b) of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-518, October 27, 2006, 53 DCR 9104).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(b) of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-6, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1452).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 304(b) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 13325).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 304(b) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 304(b) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).